Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.570

Proceedings subject to administrative procedure act—Exemptions.

(1) All proceedings conducted under this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW unless otherwise provided for in this chapter.

(2) Rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW 34.05.310, chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, and RCW 43.135.055 when the adoption of the rules is determined by a referendum vote of the affected parties.

[ 2002 c 313 s 36; 1961 c 256 s 57.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.